Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2394.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 48.135 RCW to read as follows:For purposes of this chapter, unless the context clearly requires otherwise, "insurer" means an entity described in RCW 48.01.050 and includes, but is not limited to, an insurance company authorized under chapter 48.05 RCW, a disability insurer regulated under chapter 48.20 or 48.21 RCW, a health care service contractor registered under chapter 48.44 RCW, and a health maintenance organization registered under chapter 48.46 RCW.Sec. 2. RCW 48.135.005 and 2006 c 284 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:The purpose of this chapter and sections 14 through 17, chapter 284, Laws of 2006 is to confront the problem of insurance fraud ((in this state by making a concerted effort to detect insurance fraud, reduce the occurrence of fraud through criminal enforcement and deterrence, require restitution of fraudulently obtained insurance benefits and expenses incurred by an insurer in investigating fraudulent claims,))and other crimes that impact the insurance industry, or insurance consumers or beneficiaries in this state by updating definitions to address recurring or technologically sophisticated fraud schemes, and making a concerted effort to: Detect such crimes, reduce their occurrence through criminal enforcement and deterrence; require restitution of expenses incurred by an insurer in investigating or paying fraudulent claims or resulting from other crimes; require restitution to insurance consumers victimized by insurance fraud and other insurance-related crimes; and reduce the amount of premium dollars used to pay fraudulent claims. The primary focus of the insurance fraud program is on organized ((fraudulent activities committed against insurance companies))or collusive criminal schemes that fraudulent activities committed against impact insurance companies or insurance consumers.Sec. 3. RCW 48.135.010 and 2009 c 162 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:((The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Insurance fraud" means an act or omission committed by a person who,))(1) A person is guilty of insurance fraud if the person knowingly, and with intent to defraud, commits, or conceals any material information concerning, one or more of the following:(a) Presenting, causing to be presented, or preparing with knowledge or belief that it will be presented to or by an insurer, insurance producer, or surplus line broker, false information as part of, in support of, or concerning a fact material to one or more of the following:(i) An application for the issuance or renewal of an insurance policy;(ii) The rating of an insurance policy or contract;(iii) A claim for payment or benefit pursuant to an insurance policy;(iv) Premiums paid on an insurance policy;(v) Payments made in accordance with the terms of an insurance policy; or(vi) The reinstatement of an insurance policy;(b) ((Willful embezzlement))Embezzling, abstracting, purloining, or engaging or conspiring in conversion of moneys, funds, premiums, credits, benefits, or other property of an insurer ((or)), person engaged in the business of insurance((; or(c))), or insurance consumer or beneficiary;(c) Submitting of a bill or claim to an insurer or insurance consumer:(i) For medical, vehicle, or property services not rendered, vehicle or property repairs not made, or supplies not provided;(ii) Using a current procedural terminology (CPT) code or health care common procedure coding system (HCPCS) code not reasonably appropriate to the service provided or procedure performed; or(iii) Using the name, credentials, or national provider identifier (NPI) of a health care provider who neither rendered nor supervised the billed service;(d) Submitting a statement, estimate, invoice, bid, proposal, proof of loss, or any other document that misrepresents the scope of damages or costs of repairs associated with a property insurance claim;(e) Falsifying diagnostic or treatment information in a patient's medical file to bill for treatments or prescriptions that would not otherwise have been covered by the insurer;(f) Misrepresenting the identity of, or impersonating, a person, government representative, or business in connection with an insurance policy application, premium payment, claim, or the solicitation or performance of mitigation, restoration, or repair services;(g) Procuring or handling funds intended for payment of premium in any of the following ways:(i) Collecting or receiving funds intended for the payment of premium from an individual or entity, or under a premium finance agreement, but misappropriating or converting the funds, or failing to remit the funds to the insurer in a prompt manner;(ii) Misrepresenting the amount of premium owed or the terms of a premium finance agreement; or(iii) Submitting falsified or forged premium finance agreements or insurance policy information to obtain premium finance loan proceeds;(h) When appraising or umpiring under the appraisal clause of an insurance contract, failing to do so in an impartial manner, including:(i) In a self-interested manner, such as on a contingency fee basis, or to secure additional appraisal or umpiring opportunities; or(ii) According to influence from an insurer, policyholder, claimant, or other; or(i) Attempting to commit, aiding or abetting in the commission of, or conspiracy to commit the acts or omissions specified in this subsection (1).((The definition of insurance fraud is for illustrative purposes only under this chapter to describe the nature of the behavior to be reported and investigated, and is not intended in any manner to create or modify the definition of any existing criminal acts nor to create or modify the burdens of proof in any criminal prosecution brought as a result of an investigation under this chapter.(2) "Insurer" means an insurance company authorized under chapter 48.05 RCW, a health care service contractor registered under chapter 48.44 RCW, and a health care maintenance organization registered under chapter 48.46 RCW.))(2)(a) Insurance fraud is a class B felony.(b) For purposes of this section, each instance of insurance fraud constitutes a separate offense.(c) Insurance fraud may be charged and prosecuted in any county where the crime occurred, the accused resides, an insurance consumer or beneficiary victimized by the crime resides, or an impacted insurer has its primary place of business within the state.(3)(a) For purposes of determining under subsection (1)(c)(ii) of this section whether a current procedural terminology code was reasonably appropriate for the service provided or procedure performed, the trier of fact must consider any evidence presented, and the applicable current procedural terminology code set published by the American medical association.(b) For purposes of determining under subsection (1)(c)(ii) of this section whether a health care common procedure coding system code was reasonably appropriate for the service provided or the procedure performed, the trier of fact must consider any evidence presented, and the applicable current procedural terminology code set published by the department of health and human services, centers for medicare and medicaid services.Sec. 4. RCW 48.135.020 and 2006 c 284 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1) There is established an insurance fraud program within the office of the insurance commissioner. The commissioner may employ supervisory, legal, ((and)) investigative, and other personnel for the program, who must be qualified by training and experience in the areas of detection, investigation, or prosecution of fraud ((in which the insurance industry is a victim))and other crimes in which the insurance industry or an insurance consumer or beneficiary is a victim or is impacted. The chief of the fraud program is a full-time position that is appointed by the commissioner. The chief serves at the pleasure of the commissioner. The commissioner shall provide office space, equipment, supplies, investigators, clerical staff, and other staff that are necessary for the program to carry out its duties and responsibilities under this chapter.(2) The commissioner may fund one or more state patrol officers to work with the insurance fraud program and the funding for the officers must be paid out of the budget of the insurance fraud program.(3) The commissioner may fund one or more assistant attorneys general and support staff to work with the insurance fraud program and the funding for the assistant attorneys general and support staff must be paid out of the budget of the insurance fraud program.(4) The commissioner may make grants to or reimburse local prosecuting attorneys to assist in the prosecution of insurance fraud. The grants must be paid out of the budget of the insurance fraud program. The commissioner may investigate and seek prosecution of crimes involving insurance fraud upon the request of or with the concurrence of the county prosecuting attorney of the jurisdiction in which the offense has occurred. Before such a prosecution, the commissioner and the county in which the offense occurred shall reach an agreement regarding the payment of all costs, including expert witness fees, and defense attorneys' fees associated with any such prosecution.(((5) Staff levels for this program, until June 30, 2010, shall not exceed 8.0 full-time equivalents.))Sec. 5. RCW 48.135.040 and 2006 c 284 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The commissioner may:(a) Employ and train personnel, and contract for goods and services, to achieve the purposes of this chapter and to employ legal counsel, investigators, auditors, financial or digital forensic staff, and clerical support personnel and other personnel as the commissioner determines necessary from time to time to accomplish the purposes of this chapter;(b) Initiate inquiries and conduct investigations when the commissioner has cause to believe that insurance fraud or other crimes that impact the insurance industry or insurance consumers or beneficiaries, has been, is being, or is about to be committed;(c) Conduct independent ((examinations))investigations of alleged insurance fraud or other crimes that impact the insurance industry or insurance consumers or beneficiaries;(d) Review notices, reports, or complaints of suspected insurance fraud ((activities))or other crimes that impact the insurance industry or insurance consumers or beneficiaries, from federal, state, and local law enforcement and regulatory agencies, persons engaged in the business of insurance, and any other person to determine whether the reports require further investigation;(e) Share records and evidence with federal, state, or local law enforcement ((or regulatory agencies, and enter into interagency)), prosecutorial, or regulatory entities, and enter into interagency, joint operation, or cross commission agreements;(f) Conduct investigations outside this state. If the information the commissioner seeks to obtain is located outside this state, the person from whom the information is sought may make the information available to the commissioner to examine at the place where the information is located. The commissioner may designate representatives, including officials of the state in which the matter is located, to inspect the information on behalf of the commissioner, and the commissioner may respond to similar requests from officials of other states;(g) Administer oaths and affirmations, subpoena witnesses, compel their attendance, ((take))obtain evidence, and require and compel the production of any books, papers, correspondence, memoranda, agreements, data, or other documents or records that the commissioner deems relevant or material to an inquiry concerning insurance fraud or other crimes that impact the insurance industry or insurance consumers or beneficiaries;(h) Report incidents of alleged insurance fraud or other crimes that impact the insurance industry or insurance consumers or beneficiaries, disclosed by its investigations to the appropriate prosecutorial authority((,)) including, but not limited to, the attorney general, a county or federal prosecuting authority, and to any other appropriate law enforcement, administrative, regulatory, or licensing agency;(i) Assemble evidence, prepare charges, and work closely with any prosecutorial authority having jurisdiction to pursue prosecution of insurance fraud or other crimes that impact the insurance industry or insurance consumers or beneficiaries; ((and))(j) Undertake independent studies to determine the extent of ((fraudulent insurance acts))criminal acts that impact the insurance industry or insurance consumers or beneficiaries; and(k) Acquire and use technology to accomplish the purposes of this chapter including, but not limited to, detecting crime and collusive schemes, and organizing and analyzing data, evidence, investigations, and exhibits.(2) The fraud program investigators who have obtained certification as a peace officer under RCW 43.101.095 have the powers and status of a limited authority Washington peace officer.Sec. 6. RCW 48.135.050 and 2006 c 284 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Any insurer or licensee of the commissioner that has reasonable belief that an act of insurance fraud ((which is or may be a crime under Washington law))or other crimes that impact the insurance industry or insurance consumers or beneficiaries, has been, is being, or is about to be committed shall furnish and disclose the knowledge and information to the commissioner or the national insurance crime bureau, the national association of insurance commissioners, or similar organization, who shall disclose the information to the commissioner((, and)). The insurer and any licensee of the commissioner shall cooperate fully with any investigation conducted by the commissioner.(2) Any person that has a reasonable belief that an act of insurance fraud ((which is or may be a crime under Washington law))or other crimes that impact the insurance industry or insurance consumers or beneficiaries, has been, is being, or is about to be committed; or any person who collects, reviews, or analyzes information concerning insurance fraud ((which is or may be a crime under Washington law))or other crimes that impact the insurance industry or insurance consumers or beneficiaries, may furnish and disclose any information in its possession concerning such an act to the commissioner or to an authorized representative of an insurer that requests the information for the purpose of detecting, prosecuting, or preventing ((insurance fraud))crime that impacts the insurance industry, or insurance consumers or beneficiaries.(3) Any certified public accountant, state or local law enforcement agency, public safety entity, or regulatory entity for health care or financial service providers, that has reasonable belief that an act of insurance fraud or other crime that impacts the insurance industry or insurance consumers or beneficiaries, has been, is being, or is about to be committed, shall furnish and disclose any information in its possession concerning such an act to the commissioner.(4) Any business entity registered to do business in this state under chapter 23.95 RCW that executes an agreement to finance the payment of a premium for an insurance policy shall send a copy of the executed agreement and the associated insurance policy to the commissioner within 30 calendar days of executing the agreement.Sec. 7. RCW 48.135.060 and 2006 c 284 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Documents, materials, or other information as described in subsection (3), (4), or both of this section are exempt from public inspection and copying under chapter((s 42.17 and)) 42.56 RCW. The commissioner is authorized to use such documents, materials, or other information in the furtherance of any regulatory or legal action brought as a part of the commissioner's official duties.(2) The commissioner:(a) May share documents, materials, or other information, including the documents, materials, or information subject to subsection (1) of this section, with (i) the national association of insurance commissioners and its affiliates and subsidiaries, (ii) regulatory and law enforcement officials of other states and nations, the federal government, and international authorities, (iii) the national insurance crime bureau, and (iv) an insurer with respect to whom the suspected fraudulent claim may be perpetrated;(b) May receive documents, materials, or information from (((i) the))any source including, but not limited to: (i) The national association of insurance commissioners and its affiliates and subsidiaries, (ii) regulatory and law enforcement officials of other states and nations, the federal government, and international authorities, (iii) the national insurance crime bureau, and (iv) an insurer with respect to whom the suspected fraudulent claim may be perpetrated and any such documents, materials, or information as described in subsection (3), (4), or both of this section are exempt from public inspection and copying; and(c) May enter into agreements governing the sharing and use of information consistent with this subsection.(3) Specific intelligence information and specific investigative records compiled by investigative, law enforcement, and penology agencies, the fraud program of the office of the insurance commissioner, and state agencies vested with the responsibility to discipline members of any profession, the nondisclosure of which is essential to effective law enforcement or for the protection of any person's right to privacy, are exempt under subsection (1) of this section.(4) Information revealing the identity of persons who are witnesses to or victims of crime or who file complaints with investigative, law enforcement, and penology agencies, or the fraud program of the office of the insurance commissioner, if disclosure would endanger any person's life, physical safety, or property, is exempt under subsection (1) of this section. If at the time a complaint is filed the complainant, victim, or witness indicates a desire for disclosure or nondisclosure, such desire shall govern.(5) No waiver of an existing privilege or claim of confidentiality in the documents, materials, or information may occur as a result of disclosure to the commissioner under this section or as a result of sharing documents, materials, or information as authorized in subsection (2) of this section.(6) Documents, materials, or other information that is in the possession of persons other than the commissioner that would otherwise not be confidential by law or privileged do not become confidential by law or privileged by providing the documents, materials, or other information to the commissioner.Sec. 8. RCW 48.135.070 and 2006 c 284 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:In a criminal prosecution for any crime under Washington law in which ((the insurance company is a victim, the insurance company))an insured person or an insurance company, consumer, or beneficiary is a victim, the insured person, insurance company, consumer, or beneficiary is entitled to be considered as a victim in any restitution ordered by the court under RCW 9.94A.753 or 9.94A.750, as part of the criminal penalty imposed against the defendant convicted for such a violation.Sec. 9. RCW 9A.04.080 and 2024 c 298 s 16 and 2024 c 297 s 11 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) Prosecutions for criminal offenses shall not be commenced after the periods prescribed in this section.(a) The following offenses may be prosecuted at any time after their commission:(i) Murder;(ii) Homicide by abuse;(iii) Arson if a death results;(iv) Vehicular homicide;(v) Vehicular assault if a death results;(vi) Hit-and-run injury-accident if a death results (RCW 46.52.020(4));(vii) Rape in the first degree (RCW 9A.44.040) if the victim is under the age of sixteen;(viii) Rape in the second degree (RCW 9A.44.050) if the victim is under the age of sixteen;(ix) Rape of a child in the first degree (RCW 9A.44.073);(x) Rape of a child in the second degree (RCW 9A.44.076);(xi) Rape of a child in the third degree (RCW 9A.44.079);(xii) Sexual misconduct with a minor in the first degree (RCW 9A.44.093);(xiii) Custodial sexual misconduct in the first degree (RCW 9A.44.160);(xiv) Child molestation in the first degree (RCW 9A.44.083);(xv) Child molestation in the second degree (RCW 9A.44.086);(xvi) Child molestation in the third degree (RCW 9A.44.089);(xvii) Sexual exploitation of a minor (RCW 9.68A.040);(xviii) Rape in the first degree (RCW 9A.44.040) if the perpetrator is a first responder as defined in RCW 70.54.430 and if the first responder used the first responder's position to facilitate the commission of the offense;(xix) Rape in the second degree (RCW 9A.44.050) if the perpetrator is a first responder as defined in RCW 70.54.430 and if the first responder used the first responder's position to facilitate the commission of the offense;(xx) Rape in the third degree (RCW 9A.44.060) if the perpetrator is a first responder as defined in RCW 70.54.430 and if the first responder used the first responder's position to facilitate the commission of the offense;(xxi) Trafficking (RCW 9A.40.100) if the victim is under the age of 18;(xxii) Commercial sexual abuse of a minor (RCW 9.68A.100);(xxiii) Promoting commercial sexual abuse of a minor (RCW 9.68A.101);(xxiv) Promoting travel for commercial sexual abuse of a minor (RCW 9.68A.102); and(xxv) Permitting commercial sexual abuse of a minor (RCW 9.68A.103).(b) Except as provided in (a) of this subsection, the following offenses may not be prosecuted more than 20 years after its commission:(i) Rape in the first degree (RCW 9A.44.040);(ii) Rape in the second degree (RCW 9A.44.050); or(iii) Indecent liberties (RCW 9A.44.100).(c) The following offenses may not be prosecuted more than ten years after its commission:(i) Any felony committed by a public officer if the commission is in connection with the duties of his or her office or constitutes a breach of his or her public duty or a violation of the oath of office;(ii) Arson if no death results;(iii) Rape in the third degree (RCW 9A.44.060);(iv) Attempted murder; or(v) Trafficking under RCW 9A.40.100.(d) A violation of this offense listed in this subsection (1)(d) may be prosecuted up to 10 years after its commission or, if committed against a victim under the age of 18, up to the victim's 30th birthday, whichever is later: RCW 9A.64.020 (incest).(e) A violation of RCW 9A.36.170 may be prosecuted up to 10 years after its commission, or if committed against a victim under the age of 18, up to the victim's 28th birthday, whichever is later.(f) A violation of RCW 48.135.010 may not be prosecuted more than 10 years after its commission or discovery, whichever is later.(g) The following offenses may not be prosecuted more than six years after its commission or discovery, whichever occurs later:(i) Violations of RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080;(ii) Any felony violation of chapter 9A.83 RCW;(iii) Any felony violation of chapter 9.35 RCW;(iv) Theft in the first or second degree under chapter 9A.56 RCW when accomplished by color or aid of deception;(v) Theft from a vulnerable adult under RCW 9A.56.400;(vi) Trafficking in stolen property in the first or second degree under chapter 9A.82 RCW in which the stolen property is a motor vehicle or major component part of a motor vehicle as defined in RCW 46.80.010; or(vii) Violations of RCW 82.32.290 (2)(a)(iii) or (4).(((g)))(h) The following offenses may not be prosecuted more than five years after its commission: Any class C felony under chapter 74.09, 82.36, or 82.38 RCW.(((h)))(i) Bigamy may not be prosecuted more than three years after the time specified in RCW 9A.64.010.(((i)))(j) A violation of RCW 9A.56.030 may not be prosecuted more than three years after the discovery of the offense when the victim is a tax exempt corporation under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3).(((j)))(k) No other felony may be prosecuted more than three years after its commission; except that in a prosecution under RCW 9A.44.115, if the person who was viewed, photographed, or filmed did not realize at the time that he or she was being viewed, photographed, or filmed, the prosecution must be commenced within two years of the time the person who was viewed or in the photograph or film first learns that he or she was viewed, photographed, or filmed.(((k)))(l) No gross misdemeanor, except as provided under (e) of this subsection, may be prosecuted more than two years after its commission.(((l)))(m) No misdemeanor may be prosecuted more than one year after its commission.(2) The periods of limitation prescribed in subsection (1) of this section do not run during any time when the person charged is not usually and publicly resident within this state.(3) In any prosecution for a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, the periods of limitation prescribed in subsection (1) of this section run from the date of commission or four years from the date on which the identity of the suspect is conclusively established by deoxyribonucleic acid testing or by photograph as defined in RCW 9.68A.011, whichever is later.(4) If, before the end of a period of limitation prescribed in subsection (1) of this section, an indictment has been found or a complaint or an information has been filed, and the indictment, complaint, or information is set aside, then the period of limitation is extended by a period equal to the length of time from the finding or filing to the setting aside.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 10. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.--- END ---